Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2152.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1306-B(j) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1306-B. School Safety and Security Grant Program.* * *(j) Specific purposes.--The committee shall provide grants to school entities for programs that address school mental health and safety and security, including:* * *<--12345678910111213141516171819 (33) Costs associated with the planning, implementation or operation of a later school start time. A school entity that applies for funding under this paragraph must adopt a policy under section 1504.1 relating to TO IMPLEMENT an instructional day start time no earlier than 8:30 a.m. for THAT OCCURS AT LEAST 15 MINUTES LATER THAN THE CURRENT START TIME FOR ITS secondary schools. * * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1504.1. Delaying Secondary School Start Times.--(a) The governing body of a school entity may adopt a policy to implement an instructional day start time at the secondary school level to start no earlier than 8:30 a.m. THAT OCCURS AT LEAST FIFTEEN (15) MINUTES LATER THAN THE CURRENT START TIME FOR ITS SECONDARY LEVEL. Prior to adopting the new start time, the governing body shall inform its community, including parents, students, school administrators, school employes and other stakeholders about the health, safety and academic impacts of sleep deprivation on secondary school students and the benefits of a later secondary school start time and shall discuss with the community local strategies to successfully implement the later school start time . (b) The department shall provide guidance and support for school entities to explore changes to secondary school start times and to engage in public education campaigns to raise awareness about the importance of adequate sleep for adolescents.(c) (B) School entities that adopt a policy under subsection (a) may use funding under section 1306-B(j)(33) to alleviate costs associated with the planning, implementation or operation 20260HB2152PN2879 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a later school start time. (d) (C) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: "Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Secondary school" shall mean a school entity that provides instruction in grades seven through twelve or any combination of those grades.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2152PN2879 - 3 - <--12345678910111213